Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1104
Accredited school or college of dentistry, defined.

Accredited school or college of dentistry means a school or college approved by the board and accredited by the American Dental Association Commission on Dental Accreditation, which is an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as an accrediting body.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 437.